Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.090

Liquidation account—Establishment and maintenance required.

A converting savings bank shall establish and maintain a liquidation account for the benefit of eligible account holders and supplemental eligible account holders in the event of a subsequent complete liquidation of the converted savings bank, in accordance with RCW 32.32.185 through 32.32.205.

[ 1981 c 85 s 17.]